yeoman-custom/cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/pt_rules
// translation rules Brazilian
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Options
// ?1  European Portuguese
// ?2  Brazilian Portuguese
// ?3  Epenthetic [I] between consonants
// ?4  Brazil mbrola voice

// Letter groups
// A  a vowel
// B  a consonant, except h l r w y
// C  a consonant
// G  a voiced consonant
// K  not a vowel

.group a
     _) a (_       a
     _) a (_W      'a        // in an acronym
        a          a
     &) a (_       =&        // in final unstressed syllable
     &) a (s_      =&
     &) a (_a      =&/       // ?? elide final a before a
     &) a (_à      =&/
?1      a (_       =&        // in final unstressed syllable
?1      a (s_      =&
?1      a (_a      =&/       // ?? elide final a before a
?1      a (_à      =&/

        a (C_      &
        a (r_      'a
?1   p) a (d_      =E
        a (CC_     &
?1      a (l_      'A        // eg: Portugal, capital, etc.
?1      a (lK      ,A        // Algarve, Almerinda, etc...
?2      al (K      aU
        a (lh+     a

        a (m       &~
        a (mAr_    &
        a (mA@     &
        a (n       &~
        a (nA@     &
        a (nAr_    &
        am (_      =&~N
        am (C      &~m
?4      am (C      &~N
        an (K+     &~N
        anh (A     &~n^
        am (_      =&U~
?1      a (z_      'a        //eg: paz, rapaz, capaz, etc...
?1   C) acç        'a's      // eg: selecção, etc...

        ai         aI
        ai (s      aI
        a (iu_     a         // caiu
        a (iCK     a
        ay         aI
        ao (_      aU
        au         aU
        au (s      aU
        a (uCK     a


.group â
        â          ''&
        â (m       ''&~
        â (n       ''&~
        âm (K      ''&~m
        ân (K      ''&~N
        ânh        ''&~n^


.group à
        à          a
     _) à (s_      aI

        à (m       &~
        à (n       &~
        àm (K      &~m
        àn (K      &~N
        ành (A     &~n^


.group á
        á          ''a
        ái         ''aI
        ái (s      ''aI
        á (iCK     ''a
        áy         ''aI
        áu         ''aU
        áu (s      ''aU
?1      ál         ''Al
        á (uCK     ''a


.group ã
        ã          &~
        ão         &U~


.group b
     _) b (_       be
        b          b
        b (b 
?3      b (B       bI
?3      b (s       b
?3      b (_C      b_


.group c
     _) c (_       se
        c          k
        c (Y       s         // ce ci
?3      c (B       kI
?3      c (s       k
?3      c (t       k
?3      c (_C      k_
        ch         S
        ck         k
?1      c (c                 //drop “c” in European Portuguese (eg: seleccionar)
?1   A) ct         t         //drop “c” in European Portuguese (eg: exacto)
?1   A) cç         s         //drop “c” in European Portuguese (eg: selecção)
?1 conta) ct (A      kt        // eg: contacto, contactar, contactável, incontactável, etc...


.group d
     _) d (_       de
        d          d
        d (d 
?3      d (B       dZI
?3      d (_C      d_
?2      d (i       dZ
?2      d (í       dZ
?2      d (e_      dZ


.group e
     _) e (_       E
        e          e
        e (_       =y
        e (s_      =y
?2      e (_AN     =i/       // ?? elide to [j] if next word starts with a vowel
?2  &l) e (_AN     =i        //    but not after l or r
?2  &r) e (_AN     =i
?1      e (_iN     =i/       // drop final [i] is next word starts with another i

?1      e (e       i         //eg: candeeiro
?2      ee         i
?2  pr) ee (n      ee

?2      el (K      EU
        e (lh+     e
     v) e (lhA_    E

        e (be_     E
        e (bem_    E

        e (ca_     E
        e (ce_     E
        e (cem_    E

        e (chA_    E
        e (chAm_   E
     r) e (cho_    e

        e (clA_    E
        e (clAm_   E
        e (co_     E
        e (ctA_    E
        e (ctAm_   E
        e (çA_     E
        e (çAm_     E

        e (de_     E
        e (dem_    E

        e (fa_     E

        e (gA_     E
        e (gAm_    E

        e (grA_    E
        e (grAm_   E

     h) e (gA_     e
     h) e (gAm_    e

        e (gue_    E
        e (guem_   E

        e (lA_     E
        e (lo_     e
        e (lAm_    E

     i) e (r_      E
    @s) e (r_      E
     u) e (r_      E

    ib) e (rA_     E
     d) e (rA_     E
    ed) e (rAm_    e
     m) e (rA_     E
    iv) e (rAm_    E
   pod) e (rA_     e
     d) e (rAm_    E
    ib) e (rAm_    E
    @s) e (rA_     E
    @s) e (rAm_    E
    sp) e (rA_     E
    sp) e (rAm_    E

        e (rgA_    E
        e (rgAm_   E

        e (rsA_    E
        e (rsAm_   E

        e (se_     E
        e (sem_    E

        e (ssA_    E
        e (ssAm_   E

        e (stA_    E
        e (stAm_   E
        e (strA_   E

        e (rnA_    E
        e (rnAm_   E

        e (rtA_    E
        e (rtAm_   E

        e (rrA_    E
        e (rrAm_   E

        e (rvA_    E
        e (rvAm_   E

        e (tA_     E
    An) e (tA_     e
   gaz) e (ta_     e
        e (tAm_    E

        e (vA_     E
     t) e (ve_     e
        e (vi_     e
        e (vê_     e
        e (vAm_    E

        e (rrAs_   E

        e (x_      E
        e (xA_     E
        e (xAm_    E
?2  _n) e (t       E

        em (C      eIm
        en (K      eIN
        enh        en^

        em (_      =eIN
        em (s_     =eIN
        en (_      =eIN
        en (s_     =eIN

        ei         eI
        ei (s      eI
        e (iCK     e
        ey         eI
        eu         eU
        eu (s      eU
        e (uCK     e

?1   d) e (CAA     y
?1   d) e (CACAA   y
?1   d) e (CACAC   y
?1   d) e (CACC    y
?1   d) e (CCAA    y
?1   d) e (nCAA    ,e
?1   d) e (CCACA   y
?1   d) e (nCACA   ,e
?1   d) e (CCACCA  y
?1   d) e (nCACCA  ,e

     j) e (tA_     E
     j) e (tAm_    E
    _r) eex (A     eez

?1   _) es (C@@    S         // drop initial "e".
?1   _) e (f       i         // efectuar, etc.
?1  _n) e (nhu     i         // eg: nenhum, nenhuma, nenhuns, nenhumas.
?1      e (la_     'E        // eg: cadela, janela, vela, etc...
?1   C) e (cC      ,E        // eg: seleccionar, efectuar, etc...
?1   C) ecç        'E's      // eg: selecção, etc...
?1   C) e (ã       i         // leão, panteão, etc.
?1   C) e (a       i         // oceano, etc.
?1   C) e (o       'i        // eg: geologia, etc...
?1   C) e (ú       i         // conteúdo, etc.
?1  Cã) e          j         // cães, mãe, etc...
?1   c) e (rea     y         // cereais
?1   d) e (fici    y         // deficiênte, deficiência, etc...
?1  _d) e (fini    y         //definições.
?1  _d) e (slig    y         // desligar.
?1  _d) e (sloc    y         // eg: deslocamento, etc...
?1  _f) e (ch      y         // fechar
?1  _p) e (rcentag y         // percentagem
?1   p) e (ssoa    y         //pessoal, pessoais, etc.
?1  pr) e (cis     y         // precisar
?1  pr) e (f       y         // preferências, etc.
?1  _r) e (cicl    y         // recicla, reciclagem, etc...
?1   r) e (cor     y         // recorrer, recordar
?1   r) e (luz     y         // eg: reluzir
?1   r) e (lva     ,E        // eg: relvado
?1   r) e (smung   y         // resmungar
?1   r) e (ss      y         // eg: ressequidos
?1   r) e (volv    y         // revolver
?1   r) e (vel     y         // revelar
?1  _t) e (rmin    y         // terminar.
?1  _v) e (loci    y         // velocidade
?1  _f) e (rramenta y        // ferramenta, ferramentas.
?1  _p) e (squ     y         // pesquisar
?1 hip) e (r       ,E        // eg: hiper
?1 sup) e (r       ,E        // super
?1  _m) e (ga      ,E        // mega
?1 _int) e (rn      ,E        // Interno
?1   n) e (t       'E        // eg: net
?1      e (l_      'E        // eg: possível, manuel, etc...
?1   v) e (l_      ,E        // eg: possível, amovível, disponível, etc...
?1   l) e (ta      'E        // eg: bicicleta, atleta.


.group é
        é          ''E
        éi         ''EI
        éi (s      ''EI
        é (iCK     ''E
        éy         ''eI
        éu         ''EU
        éu (s      ''EU
        é (uCK     ''E
        ém (_      ''eIN
        ém (s_     ''eIN
        én (_      ''eIN
        én (s_     ''eIN


.group ê
        ê          ''e
        êm (_      ''eIN
        êm (C      ''eIm
        ên (K      ''eIN
        ênh        ''en^
        êm (_      ''eIN


.group f
?1   _) f (_W      Ef;       // within an acronym
?1   _) f (_       Ef        // individual letter or end-of-acronym
     _) f (_       'Efe
        f          f
        f (f 
?3      f (B       fI
?3      f (_C      f_


.group g
?1   _) g (_       ge
?1   _) g (_W      Ze        // within an acronym
     _) g (_       Ze
        g          g
        g (g 
?3      g (B       gI
?3      g (_C      g_
        g (Y       Z         // ge gi
        gu (Y      g
?1      guen (C    gw'eIN    // aguenta, etc.
?1   n) gu (A      gw        // eg: língua, etc.
?1 man) gu (ei     g         // mangueira
?1      gu (ém_    g         // eg: alguém, ninguém, etc...


.group h
     _) h (_       ag'a
        h                    // silent


.group i
     _) i (_       i
        i          i
        i (A       j
        i (o       i
    Cr) i          i
    Cl) i          i
        i (_       'i

?2      il (K      iU
        i (lh+     i

        im (_      iN
        im (C      im
?4      im (C      iN
        in (C      iN        // ?4  ??
        in (g      iN
        in (k      iN
        inh        in^

        i (A_      'i
        i (am_     'i
        io (_      iU
        io (s_     iU
        i (oCK     i
        iu (_      iU
        iu (s_     iU
        i (uCK     i

    áC) i (A_      j
   áCC) i (A_      j
    âC) i (A_      j
   âCC) i (A_      j
    éC) i (A_      j
   éCC) i (A_      j
    êC) i (A_      j
   êCC) i (A_      j
    íC) i (A_      j
   íCC) i (A_      j
    óC) i (A_      j
   óCC) i (A_      j
    ôC) i (A_      j
   ôCC) i (A_      j
    úC) i (A_      j
   úCC) i (A_      j

?1   _) i (ntern   'i        //inter
?1   @) ing (_     _^_EN
?1   @) ings (_    _^_EN


.group í
        í          ''i
        í (m       ''i
        í (n       ''i
        ím (_      ''iN
        ím (C      ''im
        ín (K      ''iN
        ính        ''in^


.group j
     _) j (_       Z'Ot&
        j          Z
?3      j (B       ZI
?3      j (_C      Z_


.group k
?1   _) k (_       k'ap&
?2   _) k (_       ka
        k          k
        k (k 
?3      k (B       kI
?3      k (s       k
?3      k (t       k
?3      k (_C      k_


.group l
?1   _) l (_W      El;       // within an acronym
?1   _) l (_       El
     _) l (_       'Ele
        l          l
     l) l 
        lh         l^
     A) lh         lj
?1   A) lh         l^
?4   A) lh         l^


.group m
?1   _) m (_W      Em;
?1   _) m (_       Em
     _) m (_       'eme
        m          m
        m (m 
?3      m (B       mI
?3      m (_C      m_


.group n
?1   _) n (_W      En;
?1   _) n (_       En
     _) n (_       'ene
        n          n
        n (n 
?3      n (B       nI
?3      n (_C      n_
        nh         n^
?1   A) nn         n         //drop “n” (eg: connosco).


.group o
        o          o
     @) o (_       =U
        o (s_      =U
        ou         ow
        oi         oI
        oi (s      oI
        o (iCK     o
        oo         u
        oon        u~N
     c) oo         oo
?1   C) oo (_      ow        // eg: voo, enjoo, etc...
        oy         OI

        o (cA_     O
        o (cAm_    O

        o (que_    O
        o (quem_   O

     p) o (dA_     O
     p) o (dAm_    O

        o (g_      O
        o (gs_     O

        o (ge_     O
        o (gem_    O

        o (jA_     O
        o (jAm_    O

        o (ldA_    O
        o (ldAm_   O

        o (lA_     O
        o (lAm_    O

        o (ltA_    O
        o (ltAm_   O

        o (sA_     O
        o (so_     o
        o (sAm_    O

        o (ssA_    O
        o (ssAm_   O
